Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
(1)(A)The Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall promulgate guidelines and procedures for the disclosure of relevant and necessary information regarding sex offenders to the public when the release of the information is necessary for public protection.

In developing the guidelines and procedures, the Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall consult with persons who, by experience or training, have a personal interest or professional expertise in law enforcement, crime prevention, victim advocacy, criminology, psychology, parole, public education, and community relations.

(A)The guidelines and procedures shall identify factors relevant to a sex offender's future dangerousness and likelihood of reoffense or threat to the community.

The guidelines and procedures shall also address the extent of the information to be disclosed and the scope of the community to whom disclosure shall be made as these factors relate to the:

Level of the sex offender's dangerousness;

Sex offender's pattern of offending behavior; and

Need of community members for information to enhance their individual and collective safety.

(1)A local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction that decides to disclose information pursuant to this section shall make a good faith effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen (14) days before a sex offender is released or placed into the community.

(1)A local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction that decides to disclose information under this section shall make a good faith effort to conceal the identity of the victim or victims of the sex offender's offense.

A local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction may continue to disclose information on a sex offender under this section for as long as the sex offender is required to be registered under this subchapter.

(1)The State Board of Education and the Career Education and Workforce Development Board shall promulgate guidelines for the disclosure to students and parents of information regarding a sex offender when such information is released to a local school district or institution of vocational training by a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a law enforcement officer from notifying members of the public about a person who may pose a danger to the public for a reason that is not enumerated in this subchapter.

The medical records or treatment evaluations of a sex offender or sexually dangerous person are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

(1)(A)The following information concerning a sex offender registered under this subchapter who is classified as a Level 3 or Level 4 offender by the Community Notification Assessment shall be made public:

The sex offender's complete name, as well as any alias;

The sex offender's date of birth;

Any sex offense to which the sex offender has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or of which the sex offender has been found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction;

The street name and block number, county, city, and zip code where the sex offender resides;

The sex offender's race and gender;

The date of the last address verification of the sex offender provided to the Arkansas Crime Information Center;

The most recent photograph of the sex offender that has been submitted to the center;

The sex offender's parole or probation office;

The street name and block number, county, city, and zip code where the sex offender is employed;

Any institution of higher education in which the sex offender is enrolled;

The vehicle identification number and license plate number of any vehicle the sex offender owns or operates; and

A physical description of the sex offender.

If a sex offender registered under this subchapter was eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time of the commission of the sex offense that required registration under this subchapter and the victim of the sex offense was fourteen (14) years of age or younger and the sex offender is classified as a Level 2 offender by the Community Notification Assessment, the following information concerning the registered sex offender shall be made public:

The sex offender's complete name, as well as any alias;

The sex offender's date of birth;

Any sex offense to which the sex offender has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or of which the sex offender has been found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction;

The street name and block number, county, city, and zip code where the sex offender resides;

The sex offender's race and gender;

The date of the last address verification of the sex offender provided to the center;

The most recent photograph of the sex offender that has been submitted to the center;

The sex offender's parole or probation office;

The street name and block number, county, city, and zip code where the sex offender is employed;

Any institution of higher education in which the sex offender is enrolled;

The vehicle identification number and license plate number of any vehicle the sex offender owns or operates; and

A physical description of the sex offender.

The center shall prepare and place the information described in subdivisions (j)(1)(A) and (B) of this section on the internet home page of the State of Arkansas.

The center may promulgate any rules necessary to implement and administer this subsection.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 2003, No. 330, § 2, subsection (j) began:

“Beginning on September 1, 2003.”

As enacted by Acts 2003, No. 330, § 2, subdivision (j)(1)(B) ended with:

“before January 1, 2004”.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “for reasons” in (h).

The 2009 amendment deleted (j)(1)(C)(ii).

The 2013 amendment by No. 505 substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” in (i); substituted “Community Notification Assessment” for “Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment” in (j)(1)(A) and (j)(1)(B); and substituted “dangerous persons” for “violent predators” in (k)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 508 added (j)(1)(A)(ix) through (j)(1)(A)(xi) and (j)(1)(B)(ix) through (j)(1)(B)(xi).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1504 added (a)(3).

The 2017 amendment substituted “a sex offender registered under this subchapter” for “a registered sex offender” in the introductory language of (j)(1)(A) and the introductory language of (j)(1)(B); added (j)(1)(A)(xii); deleted “registered” preceding “sex offender” and “sex offender's” in the introductory language of (j)(1)(B) and throughout (j)(1)(B)(i) through (j)(1)(B)(viii); added (j)(1)(B)(xii); and, in (k), substituted “This subchapter shall not” for “Nothing in this subchapter shall” and inserted “or the physical description of the sex offender”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (k)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice in (d)(3).

Cross References. Registered offender living near school, public park, youth center, or daycare prohibited, §5-14-128.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, Sex Offender Registration, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 427.

Under this section and §§12-12-917 and12-12-922, the evidence supported the sex offender's Level 2 assessment where his victim was outside the home and a Level 1 assessment only required notification inside the home and to local law enforcement, which was insufficient; the offender also indicated refusal to participate in sex-offender treatment.Gwaltney v. Sex Offender Assessment Comm., 2009 Ark. App. 668 (2009).

Circuit court's reduction of defendant's sex-offender notification level from Level 2 to Level 1 was reversed, because the agency decision setting notification at a Level 2 was supported by substantial evidence where the victim was outside defendant's home. State Sex Offender Risk Assessment Comm. v. Wallace, 2013 Ark. App. 654 (2013).

Cited: Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment v. Claybaugh, 93 Ark. App. 11, 216 S.W.3d 134 (2005); Burchette v. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment Comm., 374 Ark. 467, 288 S.W.3d 614 (2008); Parkman v. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment Comm., 2009 Ark. 205, 307 S.W.3d 6 (2009).

This subchapter shall not be interpreted to prohibit the posting on the internet or by other appropriate means of offender fact sheets or the physical description of the sex offender for those sex offenders who are determined to be:

(1)The Division of Correction shall provide notice by written or electronic means to the Arkansas Crime Information Center of the anticipated release from incarceration in a county or state penal institution of a person serving a sentence for a sex offense.

(1)(A)If available, the notice required in subsection (a) of this section shall be provided to the center ninety (90) days before the offender's anticipated release.

However, a good faith effort shall be made to provide the notice at least thirty (30) days before release.

The notice shall include the person's name, identifying factors, offense history, and anticipated future residence.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1) and (d)(2).

Upon receipt of notice, the center shall provide notice by written or electronic means to:

(1)Where possible, victim notification pursuant to this subchapter shall be accomplished by means of the computerized victim notification system established under § 12-12-1201 et seq.

The Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Department of Human Services, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall promulgate rules to establish procedures for:

(1)The Division of Community Correction shall monitor an adult sex offender under its supervisory authority who is subject to electronic monitoring under § 12-12-923.

(1)The Division of Community Correction shall promulgate rules to establish procedures for monitoring an adult sex offender under its supervisory authority who is subject to electronic monitoring under § 12-12-923.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (b)(1) designation; in (b)(1), deleted “Department of Correction, the” preceding “Department”, substituted “shall” for “and the Department of Health and Human Services may”, substituted “an adult” for “a”, inserted “under its supervisory authority who is”; added (b)(2) and made a minor punctuation change; in (c)(1), substituted “an adult” for “a” and inserted “under its supervisory authority who is”; and rewrote (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in the introductory language of (a), and in (b)(1) and (c)(1).

Crossing a state line with intent to:

Engage or attempt to engage in a sexual act with a person who has not attained twelve (12) years of age;

Knowingly engage or attempt to engage in a sexual act with another person who has not attained twelve (12) years of age; or

Knowingly engage or attempt to engage in a sexual act under the circumstances described in subdivisions (3)(A) and (B) of this section with another person who has attained twelve (12) years of age but has not attained sixteen (16) years of age and is at least four (4) years younger than the alleged offender;

“Change of address” or other words of similar import mean a change of residence or a change for more than thirty (30) days of temporary domicile, change of location of employment, education or training, or any other change that alters where a sex offender regularly spends a substantial amount of time;

“Criminal justice agency” means a government agency or any subunit thereof which is authorized by law to perform the administration of criminal justice and which allocates more than one-half (½) of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice;

“Local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction” means the:

Chief law enforcement officer of the municipality in which a sex offender:

Resides or expects to reside;

Is employed; or

Is attending an institution of training or education; or

County sheriff, if:

The municipality does not have a chief law enforcement officer; or

A sex offender resides or expects to reside, is employed, or is attending an institution of training or education in an unincorporated area of a county;

“Mental abnormality” means a congenital or acquired condition of a person that affects the emotional or volitional capacity of the person in a manner that predisposes that person to the commission of criminally sexual acts to a degree that makes the person a menace to the health and safety of other persons;

“Personality disorder” means an enduring pattern of inner experience and behavior that:

Deviates markedly from the expectation of the person's culture;

Is pervasive and inflexible across a broad range of personal and social situations;

Leads to clinically significant distress or impairment in social, occupational, or other important areas of functioning;

Is stable over time;

Has its onset in adolescence or early adulthood;

Is not better accounted for as a manifestation or consequence of another mental disorder; and

Is not due to the direct physiological effects of a substance or a general medical condition;

“Predatory” describes an act directed at a stranger or a person with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization of that person or individuals over whom that person has control;

(A)“Residency” means the place where a person lives notwithstanding that there may be an intent to move or return at some future date to another place.

“Residency” also includes:

A place of employment;

A place of training;

A place of education; or

A temporary residence or domicile in which a person resides for an aggregate of five (5) or more consecutive days during a calendar year;

“Sentencing court” means the judge of the court that sentenced the sex offender for the sex offense;

(A)“Sex offender” means a person who is adjudicated guilty of a sex offense or acquitted on the grounds of mental disease or defect of a sex offense.

Unless otherwise specified, “sex offender” includes those individuals classified by the court as a sexually dangerous person;

(A)“Sex offense” includes, but is not limited to:

The following offenses:

Rape, §5-14-103;

Sexual indecency with a child, §5-14-110;

Any felony-homicide offense under §5-10-101, §5-10-102, or §5-10-104 if the underlying felony is an offense listed in this subdivision (13)(A)(i);

Sexually grooming a child, §5-27-307;

Trafficking of persons under §5-18-103(a)(4);

Patronizing a victim of human trafficking, §5-18-104; and

Sexual extortion, §5-14-113;

An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses enumerated in subdivision (13)(A)(i) of this section;

An adjudication of guilt for an offense of the law of another state:

Which is similar to any of the offenses enumerated in subdivision (13)(A)(i) of this section; or

When that adjudication of guilt requires registration under another state's sex offender registration laws;

A violation of any former law of this state that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses enumerated in this subdivision (13)(A);

An adjudication of guilt for an offense in any federal court, the District of Columbia, a United States territory, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or for a military offense:

18 U.S.C. § 2252C;

18 U.S.C. § 2424; or

18 U.S.C. § 2425; or

An adjudication of guilt for an offense requiring registration under the laws of Canada, the United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand, or any other foreign country where an independent judiciary enforces a right to a fair trial during the year in which the conviction occurred.

(A)“Sexually dangerous person” means a person who has been adjudicated guilty or acquitted on the grounds of mental disease or defect of a sexually violent offense and who suffers from a mental abnormality or personality disorder that makes the person likely to engage in predatory sexually violent offenses.

“Social media account information” means information concerning a social media account, including without limitation:

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 3; 1999, No. 1353, § 1; 2001, No. 1496, § 3; 2001, No. 1743, § 2; 2003, No. 1390, § 4; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, §§ 1-3; 2007, No. 210, § 1; 2007, No. 394, § 2; 2009, No. 165, § 6; 2013, No. 172, § 1; 2013, No. 505, §§ 1, 2; 2013, No. 508, § 1; 2013, No. 1114, § 3; 2015, No. 357, § 1; 2015, No. 1285, § 1; 2017, No. 664, § 7; 2017, No. 916, § 1.